Arkansas statutes. Title 12 Law Enforcement, Emergency Management, and Military Affairs
Chapter 7 Arkansas Crime Commission
12-8-204. Tenure — Removal, suspension, or discharge.

The members of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall hold their offices until and unless removed for cause.

Should the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police deem it necessary to remove, suspend, discharge, demote, or transfer for disciplinary reasons any division officer, the director shall do so by written notice.

(1)Any division officer so removed, suspended, discharged, demoted, or transferred shall have the right of appeal to the Arkansas State Police Commission, provided that notice of the appeal shall be lodged with the commission within ten (10) days after notice to the officer of his or her discharge, removal, suspension, demotion, or disciplinary transfer.

When so filed, the appeal shall be heard and determined by the commission within a reasonable time from the date the appeal is filed with the commission.

(1)Provided the appeal is perfected within thirty (30) days from the date of the final order made by the commission, an appeal may be taken to the Pulaski County Circuit Court from any order of the commission discharging, removing, suspending, demoting, or transferring for disciplinary reasons any member of the division force.

The appeal shall be heard by the court without the introduction of any further testimony.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 6; 1981, No. 700, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-406; Acts 2001, No. 1697, § 12; 2019, No. 910, § 5786.

12-8-205. Political activities.

The members of the Department of Arkansas State Police shall be prohibited from engaging in any partisan political or election campaign activities during hours when they are performing work for the department.

(1)The members of the department shall not be at any time detailed to perform any work pertaining to political activities affecting either a candidate or measures.

The members of the department shall not display any political banners, posters, or literature on any department or state government offices, buildings, or other facilities.

Department vehicles shall not display any political bumper stickers or decals and shall not be used during or after working hours to promote or assist the political campaign of any person or political issue.

The members of the department shall not be required or counseled to make, solicit, or prescribe contributions toward and for any political campaign of whatsoever nature.

The members of the department may participate or assist in any political campaign of any candidate or measure so long as the participation or assistance is rendered on the member's own time and department or state government property is not involved.

The members of the department shall not publicly and openly espouse the candidacy of any person or measure in their official capacity as members of the department.

It is declared to be the intention of the General Assembly to encourage members of the department to participate in the election process so long as the participation occurs while they are off-duty and are on their own time.

(1)The violation of these provisions shall be sufficient for the removal of any member of the department force.

However, nothing in this section shall interfere with the rights of any member of the department to vote for any candidate or upon any issues as his or her reason and conscience may dictate.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-406; Acts 1997, No. 257, § 1.

12-8-206 — 12-8-209. [Repealed.]

(1)The Division of Arkansas State Police shall obtain a policy or contract of medical and hospital insurance or establish a self-insurance fund in lieu thereof to provide medical and hospital insurance for all eligible employees of the division.

The division shall pay all or a portion of the premium, fee, or other costs for the policy or contract or payments into a self-insurance fund from funds appropriated to the division for personal service matching or which may be specifically appropriated for that purpose.

The division may provide hospitalization and medical services coverage under a group health insurance program or may in lieu thereof provide coverage for hospitalization and medical insurance services under a self-insurance program established by the division for the spouses and dependents of eligible employees of the division and pay all or a portion of the premium thereon or payments into the self-insurance fund from funds appropriated for that purpose.

In the event that the division, acting pursuant to a resolution adopted by the Arkansas State Police Commission, exercises the option to establish a self-insurance program, this program shall provide hospitalization and medical services coverage for eligible employees of the division and for the spouses and dependents of eligible employees of the division as authorized in this section and shall be operated in accordance with policies, rules, procedures, and benefits prescribed by the commission.

Members of the division who retire and receive retirement benefits under the State Police Retirement System after July 1, 1985, shall be eligible to participate in the group health self-insurance program established by the commission for eligible retirees and for their spouses and dependents in the same manner and under the same conditions as provided in §§21-5-410 and21-5-411, which authorize retired state employees receiving retirement benefits under the Arkansas Public Employees' Retirement System to participate in the State and Public School Life and Health Insurance Program.

As used in this section:

“Eligible employee” means an individual who is:

History.

Acts 1971, No. 243, § 1; 1975, No. 636, § 1; 1985, No. 951, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-434 — 42-434.2; Acts 2001, No. 1697, § 17; 2017, No. 1054, § 1.

12-8-211. [Repealed.]

History.

Acts 1959, No. 91, §§ 1-3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-427 — 42-429; Acts 2001, No. 1697, § 18.

12-8-213. Equipment and uniforms.

History.

Acts 1945, No. 231, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-409; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5787.

12-8-214. Award of pistol and purchase of shotgun upon retirement or death.

The officer; or

The officer's spouse, if the spouse is eligible under applicable state and federal laws to possess a firearm.

The officer; or

The officer's spouse, if the spouse is eligible under applicable state and federal laws to possess a firearm.

History.

Acts 1981, No. 12, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-465; Acts 2003, No. 547, § 1; 2009, No. 155, § 1.

12-8-215. Additional salary payments.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 508, § 15; 1995, No. 229, § 1; 2003, No. 1041, § 3; 2013, No. 143, § 1; 2019, No. 910, §§
5788, 5789.

12-8-216. Salary administration grid.

Class Code
Title
Grade T001C
ASP MAJOR GS14 T003C
ASP CAPTAIN GS13 T007C
ASP LIEUTENANT GS12 T011C
ASP SERGEANT GS11 T022C
ASP CORPORAL GS09 T035C
ASP TROOPER 1ST CLASS GS08 T100C
ASP TROOPER GS07

Click to view table.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 1007, § 20.

Subchapter 3

— Division of Arkansas State Police Communications Equipment Leasing Act

12-8-301. Title.

This subchapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Division of Arkansas State Police Communications Equipment Leasing Act”.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 817, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-468; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5790.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police Communications Equipment Leasing Act” for “Department of Arkansas State Police Communications Equipment Leasing Act”.

12-8-302. Legislative findings and determinations.

The General Assembly finds:

That the existing communications equipment used by the Department of Arkansas State Police:

Has poor radio coverage;

Has the problems of public monitoring and lack of user privacy; and

Is subject to unauthorized usage and interference from other parties; and

That portions of the existing communications equipment are:

Worn out;

Obsolete and expensive to repair and maintain; and

Specially designed mobile and portable units having limited utility.

The General Assembly determines that adequate and modern communications equipment for the enhancement of statewide law enforcement is essential to the safety and welfare of the people of this state.

It is legislatively determined that adequate and modern communications equipment needs to be acquired in order to replace the existing communications equipment and that the most feasible and least expensive way of financing the communications equipment is by authorizing a lease-purchase agreement under the authority of this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 817, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-469.

12-8-303. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Acquire” means to acquire by lease, lease-purchase, or otherwise, construct, repair, alter, install, restore, or place on any land or in any building or motor vehicle any communications equipment by negotiation or bidding upon such terms and conditions as are determined by the Arkansas State Police Commission to be in the best interests of the Division of Arkansas State Police and that will most effectively serve the purposes of this subchapter;

“Commission” means the Arkansas State Police Commission, which is the commission created by § 12-8-102, or any successor agency;

“Communications equipment” means public safety communication equipment and systems, including buildings, structures, furnishings, and fixtures used directly for public safety purposes in connection with the operation thereof, including, but not limited to, radio broadcast and receiving, telegraph, television, teletype, microwave transmission, and similar systems of communication by voice or by conveyance of words, signals, or images by electronic or electrical means;

“Cost”, as applied to communications equipment, means all costs of such equipment and, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, shall include the following:

All costs of the acquisition of any such communications equipment and all costs incident or related thereto;

The cost of architectural, engineering, legal, and related services, including:

The cost of the preparation of plans, specifications, studies, surveys, and estimates of cost and of revenue; and

All other expenses necessary or incident to planning, providing or determining the need for or the feasibility and practicability of such communications equipment; and

All costs paid or incurred in connection with the financing of such communications equipment, including:

Out-of-pocket expenses;

The cost of financing, legal, accounting, financial advisory and consulting fees, expenses, and disbursements;

The cost of any policy of insurance, letter of credit, or guaranty;

The cost of printing, engraving, and reproduction services; and

The cost of the initial or acceptance fee of any trustee or paying agent;

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

“Lease or lease-purchase agreement” means the contract entered into by the commission to acquire the communications equipment;

“Lease payments” means payments to be made by the division from pledged revenues or other legally available sources to pay costs of communications equipment; and

“Pledged revenues” means all revenues authorized by § 12-8-307 to be pledged for the security and payment of the lease.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (1); repealed former (5) and (6); and substituted “division” for “department” in (8).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 817, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-470; Acts 2019, No. 910, §§ 5791-5793.

12-8-304. Construction — Applicability of other acts.

This subchapter shall be liberally construed to accomplish the intent and purposes of this subchapter and shall be the sole authority required for the accomplishment of these purposes.

It shall not be necessary to comply with the general provisions of other laws dealing with public commodities and public facilities and their acquisition, construction, leasing, encumbering, or disposition if:

The Arkansas State Police Commission shall comply with §§ 25-4-108 and 25-4-110 before acquiring any communications equipment authorized under this subchapter; and

The commission submits any invitation or request for bids, quotes, or proposals and the procedures to be used in evaluating them to the State Procurement Director for review and written approval prior to any obligation being incurred by the commission or the Department of Arkansas State Police as the obligation relates to any acquisition authorized and defined by this subchapter.

The enumeration of any object, purpose, power, manner, method, and thing in this subchapter shall not be deemed to exclude like or similar objects, purposes, powers, manners, methods, or things.

To the extent that there is a conflict between the provisions of this subchapter and §§ 12-8-101 — 12-8-107, 12-8-110 — 12-8-112, 12-8-114 — 12-8-116, 12-8-118, 12-8-119, 12-8-201 — 12-8-205, 12-8-213, and 12-12-103, the provisions of this subchapter shall govern.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “of this subchapter” for “thereof” in (a)(1); inserted “in this subchapter” in (b); in (c), deleted “This subchapter shall be the complete and sole authority for the accomplishment of the purposes hereof” at the beginning, and deleted “12-8-209 [repealed]”; and made minor stylistic changes.

The 2011 amendment substituted “§§25-4-108 and25-4-110” “for §§25-4-107 [repealed] and25-4-108” in (a)(2)(A).

Acquire, construct, repair, renovate, alter, maintain, and equip communications equipment for use by the Division of Arkansas State Police.

However, the communications equipment acquired under the authority of this subchapter shall not be used for the transmission of telephonic messages which bypass the public telephone network;

Contract for the lease, lease-purchase, or purchase of the communications equipment on such terms and conditions as are specified by this subchapter and approved by the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police with the consent of the commission;

Provide for the payment of the cost of acquisition from any legally available source or sources, including, without limitation, the revenues authorized by § 12-8-307, funds appropriated and made available under §§ 12-8-101 — 12-8-107, 12-8-110 — 12-8-112, 12-8-114 — 12-8-116, 12-8-118, 12-8-119, 12-8-201 — 12-8-205, 12-8-213, and 12-12-103, and funds, if any, appropriated for the communications equipment;

Purchase, acquire, lease, lease-purchase, or rent, and receive bequests or donations of, or otherwise acquire, sell, trade, or barter any real, personal, or mixed property and convert such property into money or other property;

Contract and be contracted with;

Apply for, receive, accept, and use any moneys and property from the United States Government, any agency, any state or governmental body or political subdivision, any public or private corporation or organization of any nature, or any individual;

Invest and reinvest any of its moneys in securities, obligations, banking arrangements, or investment agreements selected by the commission;

Make and execute all other instruments necessary or convenient for the performance of its duties and the exercise of its powers and functions under this subchapter;

In connection with the acquisition and financing of the costs of communication equipment, employ attorneys, accountants, underwriters, and financial advisors and such other advisors, consultants, and agents as may be necessary in its judgment, and fix their compensation;

Procure insurance against any loss in connection with its property and other assets, in such amounts and from such insurers as it may deem advisable, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance;

Procure insurance or guaranties from any public or private entities, including any department, agency, or instrumentality of the United States and to secure payment of any lease entered into under the authority of this subchapter, including the power to pay premiums on any such insurance or guaranty;

Arrange for the use of such communications equipment by any federal, state, or local governmental agency or any other person, from time to time, as any of such communications equipment is not needed by the division and collect fees and charges, as the commission determines to be reasonable, in connection with the use of any communications equipment by any other person;

Cooperate with and exchange services and information with any federal, state, or local governmental agency; and

Take such other action, not inconsistent with law, as may be necessary, convenient, or desirable to carry out the powers, purposes, and authorities set forth in this subchapter and carry out the intent of this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted “12-8-209 [repealed]” in (a)(3).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(1)(A) and (a)(2); and substituted “division” for “department” in (a)(12) and (b).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 817, §§ 7, 10; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-474, 42-476; Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 24; 2011, No. 779, § 2.

12-8-305. Arkansas State Police Commission — Additional powers.

In addition to the powers, purposes, and authorities set forth elsewhere in this subchapter or in other laws, the Arkansas State Police Commission may:

All the powers, purposes, and authorities set forth in subsection (a) of this section, except those relating to the contracting for the lease, purchase, or lease-purchase of the communications equipment, may be carried out by the division.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 817, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-471; Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 25; 2019, No. 910, §§ 5794-5797.

12-8-306. Submission of contracts and proposals.

The Arkansas State Police Commission shall submit any contract, agreement, or proposal, as authorized by this subchapter, to the Legislative Council prior to any obligation being incurred by the commission for the Legislative Council's advice and counsel.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 817, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-473; Acts 2005, No. 1962, § 26.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment deleted “Arkansas Communications Study Committee and to the” preceding the first occurrence of “Legislative Council,” and substituted “the Legislative Council's” for “their.”

12-8-307. Lease fund — Pledged revenues.

The lease payments and other costs relating to the communications equipment shall be secured solely by a lien on and pledge of all revenues derived from the following fees and charges fixed and imposed by § 27-16-801, or pursuant to any subsequent similar laws, which are confirmed, ratified, fixed, and imposed, and which are as follows:

An operator's or a motorcycle driver's license for two (2) years — six dollars ($6.00);

A chauffeur's license for two (2) years — ten dollars ($10.00);

A motor scooter license for not more than two (2) years — two dollars ($2.00);

An operator's license or a motorcycle driver's license for four (4) years — twelve dollars ($12.00); and

A chauffeur's license for four (4) years — twenty dollars ($20.00).

The pledging of such revenues, collectively the “pledged revenues”, is authorized.

On the first day of the month next succeeding the execution of any leasing agreement authorized by this subchapter, all pledged revenues are specifically declared to be cash funds restricted in their use and dedicated to be used solely as authorized in this subchapter.

On the first day of the month next succeeding the execution of the lease authorized by this subchapter and so long as lease payments remain to be paid, the pledged revenues shall not be deposited into the State Treasury and shall not be subject to legislative appropriation.

The pledged revenues shall be deposited into a bank or banks selected by the Division of Arkansas State Police, as and when received by the Commissioner of Motor Vehicles, the Office of Motor Vehicle, the Division of Arkansas State Police, the Arkansas State Police Commission, the Secretary of the Department of Finance and Administration, or any other state agency.

The pledged revenues shall be deposited to the credit of a fund created and designated as the “Division of Arkansas State Police Communications Equipment Lease Fund”, referred to in this subchapter as the lease fund.

So long as there are remaining any lease payments to be made, the General Assembly may eliminate or change the driver's license fees referred to as pledged revenues within this section, under § 27-16-801, or any subsequent similar law, but only on condition that there is always maintained in effect and made available for the payment of lease payments sources of revenue which produce revenues at least sufficient in amount to provide for the payment when due of the lease payments.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (c)(2), substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” twice, and substituted “Secretary” for “Director”; and substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police Communications Equipment Lease Fund” for “Department of Arkansas State Police Communications Equipment Lease Fund” in (c)(3).

Cross References. Department of Arkansas State Police Fund, §19-6-404.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 817, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-472; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 3374.

12-8-308. Lease fund — Payment of costs — Tax exemption.

(1)Payments to cover the costs under the lease agreement shall be paid from the Department of Arkansas State Police Communications Equipment Lease Fund on a monthly basis.

If and so long as all payments to cover the costs under the lease agreement are properly made on the last day of each fiscal quarter, the pledged revenues remaining in the Department of Arkansas State Police Communications Equipment Lease Fund in excess of a reserve of thirty percent (30%) of a fiscal quarter's requirements shall be withdrawn from the lease fund and deposited into the State Treasury as special revenues to the credit of the Department of Arkansas State Police Fund.

So long as any lease payments remain to be paid, all moneys in the Department of Arkansas State Police Communications Equipment Lease Fund shall be used solely for the payment of the lease payments, and other costs in connection with the lease, with the maintenance of necessary funds and reserves, except that the lease may provide for the withdrawal, for other lawful purposes, of surplus moneys, as defined in the lease.

The interest portion of any costs of acquiring communications equipment authorized by this subchapter shall be exempt from state, county, and municipal income, inheritance, and estate taxes.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 817, §§ 5, 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 42-472, 42-475.

12-8-309. Lease fund — Investments.

Nothing in §§12-8-307 —12-8-310 is intended to prohibit the Department of Arkansas State Police from investing moneys deposited into the Department of Arkansas State Police Communications Equipment Lease Fund, as provided in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 817, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-472.

12-8-310. Lease fund — Expiration of provisions.

The provisions of §§ 12-8-307 — 12-8-309 shall expire upon payment of the final costs authorized under the lease agreements mentioned in this subchapter.

Any balances remaining in the Department of Arkansas State Police Communications Equipment Lease Fund shall be deposited into the State Treasury to the credit of the Department of Arkansas State Police Fund as a nonrevenue receipt.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2015, No. 870, § 21, provided:

“ARKANSAS WIRELESS INFORMATION NETWORK. Once the requirements of Arkansas Code §12-8-310 are satisfied, the second two million dollars ($2,000,000) deposited into the Department of Arkansas State Police Fund generated by Arkansas Code §27-16-801(a) shall be used for the operations, maintenance, equipment and various system requirements and expenses of the Department of Arkansas State Police — Arkansas Wireless Information Network.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 265, § 21, provided: “ARKANSAS WIRELESS INFORMATION NETWORK. Once the requirements of Arkansas Code §12-8-310 are satisfied, the second two million dollars ($2,000,000) deposited into the Department of Arkansas State Police Fund generated by Arkansas Code §27-16-801(a) shall be used for the operations, maintenance, equipment and various system requirements and expenses of the Department of Arkansas State Police — Arkansas Wireless Information Network.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Effective Dates. Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 817, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 42-472.

Subchapter 4

— Arkansas Speed Trap Law

12-8-401. Title.

This subchapter may be known as and cited as the “Arkansas Speed Trap Law”.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 855, § 1.

12-8-402. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter:

“Abusing police power” means exercising police power to enforce criminal and traffic laws for the principal purpose of raising revenue for an affected municipality and not for the purpose of public safety and welfare;

“Affected highway” means any highway which is part of the state highway system;

“Affected municipality” means a city of the first class, a city of the second class, or an incorporated town through which passes an affected highway;

“Enterprise fund” means a proprietary fund type used to report an activity for which a fee is charged to external users for goods or services;

“Fiduciary fund” means a fund type used to report assets held in a trustee or agency capacity and which cannot be used to support an affected municipality's own programs; and

“Revenue” means moneys resulting from fines and costs from traffic offense citations written by or arrests made by an affected municipality's law enforcement agency or moneys resulting from ancillary actions related to the enforcement of a traffic offense, including failure to appear and failure to pay, if the traffic offense is a:

Misdemeanor;

Violation of state law; or

Violation of a local ordinance.

“Revenue” does not include moneys received by an affected municipality and remitted to another governmental entity.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (1), substituted “means exercising” for “means the exercise of”, and substituted “an affected municipality” for “the municipality”; in (3), inserted “first class, a city of the”, and inserted “an”; added (4) through (6); and made stylistic changes.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 855, § 2; 1997, No. 211, § 1; 2019, No. 364, § 1.

12-8-403. Inquiry to determine abuse.

Upon the request of the prosecuting attorney of a judicial district in which an affected municipality is located, the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police may investigate and determine whether the affected municipality is abusing police power by conducting an unlawful speed trap.

The investigation shall require the affected municipality to submit a certified record of all fines, costs, citations, and municipal expenditures, as well as the percentage of speeding citations that are written for persons speeding ten miles per hour (10 m.p.h.) or less than the posted speed limit.

The records required under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section may encompass a reasonable time period as requested by the Division of Arkansas State Police but shall contain at least ninety (90) days' worth of documentation.

The affected municipality shall submit the requested records within thirty (30) days, unless an extension for submission is approved by the director, and shall cooperate with all other aspects of the investigation.

Failure to comply with a requirement of this section shall result in automatic sanctions.

It is presumed that the affected municipality is abusing police power by conducting an unlawful speed trap upon a finding by the director that:

The amount of revenue for the affected municipality exceeded thirty percent (30%) of the affected municipality's total expenditures, less capital expenditures, water department expenditures, sewer department expenditures, fiduciary fund expenditures, enterprise fund expenditures, and debt service, in the preceding year; or

More than fifty percent (50%) of the summons written for the traffic offense of speeding that is a misdemeanor, a violation of state law, or a violation of a local ordinance in the affected municipality are written for speed limit violations that are ten miles per hour (10 m.p.h.) or less than the posted speed limit.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 364, in (a)(1), substituted “may investigate and determine whether the affected municipality” for “is authorized to investigate and determine whether any municipality”, and added “by conducting an unlawful speed trap”; in (a)(2)(A), substituted “speeding citations” for “citations”, inserted “persons speeding”, and added “limit”; rewrote (a)(2)(B); inserted “by the director” in (a)(2)(C)(i); in the introductory language of (b), inserted “by conducting an unlawful speed trap”, and inserted “by the director”; in (b)(1), substituted “for the affected municipality exceeded” for “produced by fines and costs from traffic offenses that are misdemeanors or violations of state law or local ordinance for which citations are written by the police department of the affected municipality occurring on the affected highways exceeds” and inserted “water department expenditures, sewer department expenditures, fiduciary fund expenditures, enterprise fund expenditures”; inserted “speed” following “posted” in (b)(2); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(1) and (a)(2)(B).

Order that a municipality abusing police power cease patrolling any or all affected highways; or

Order that all or any part of future fines and court costs received from traffic law violations or misdemeanor cases where the location of the offense is an affected highway be paid over to a county fund for the maintenance and operation of the public schools located in the county in which the municipality is located.

Any violation of the sanction ordered under subdivision (a)(2)(A) of this section by any police officer shall constitute a Class A misdemeanor for each citation or summons issued or misdemeanor arrest made in violation of the prosecuting attorney's order.

Amendments. The 2005 amendment substituted “prosecuting attorney's” for “director's” in (b).

The 2019 amendment substituted “Division of Arkansas State Police” for “Department of Arkansas State Police” in (a)(1).

Cross References. Fines, §5-4-201.

Imprisonment, §5-4-401.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 855, § 3; 1997, No. 842, § 1; 2001, No. 1425, § 1; 2019, No. 364, § 2;
2019, No. 910, §§ 5798, 5799.

12-8-404. Sanctions.

(1)Upon the completion of an inquiry, the Director of the Division of Arkansas State Police shall forward all information to the prosecuting attorney of the affected municipality, who will make the determination as to whether the municipality has abused its police power.

The prosecuting attorney shall have the power to issue the following sanctions:

History.

Acts 1995, No. 855, §§ 4, 5; 1997, No. 842, § 2; 2001, No. 1425, § 2; 2005, No. 1962, § 27;
2019, No. 910, § 5800.

12-8-405. Required audit inquiry.

An audit of an affected municipality under §10-4-412 or §14-58-101 shall include an inquiry to determine whether the affected municipality is potentially abusing police power.

History.

Acts 2019, No. 364, § 3.

Subchapter 5

— Crimes Against Children Division

Cross References. Child Abuse Hotline, §12-18-301 et seq.

Child Maltreatment Act, §12-18-101 et seq.

Preambles. Acts 2005, No. 1176 contained a preamble which read:

“WHEREAS, the Arkansas Child Maltreatment Act, Arkansas Code §12-12-501 et seq., is the law that allows doctors and hospital staff to report child abuse and neglect to the Arkansas State Police Child Abuse Hotline; and

“WHEREAS, the Arkansas State Police Child Abuse Hotline is a twenty-four-hour toll-free service that triggers the initiation of an investigation of child maltreatment; and

“WHEREAS, currently, the Arkansas State Police Child Abuse Hotline will not accept reports related to newborn children being born with an illegal substance present in their system as a result of the pregnant mother's use before birth of an illegal substance or with a health problem as a result of the pregnant mother's use before birth of an illegal substance; and

“WHEREAS, in order for the newborn child to be protected by the Arkansas Child Maltreatment Act and receive services, the Arkansas State Police Child Abuse Hotline must accept reports of this nature; and

“WHEREAS, this act is necessary to clarify the law so that the Arkansas State Police Child Abuse Hotline can accept reports of this nature and so that the newborn children can be provided services to protect their health and safety.

“NOW THEREFORE, …”

Effective Dates. Acts 1997, No. 1240, § 12: Apr. 9, 1997. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly that the powers and duties of the Department of Human Services in regard to the child abuse hotline and child abuse investigations will be shifted to the Arkansas State Police, either through transfer or by contract; that such transfer or contract could occur prior to or at the beginning of the next fiscal year; and that such transfer or contract cannot occur prior to or at the beginning of the next fiscal year unless this emergency clause is adopted. Therefore an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2005, No. 1176, § 6: Mar. 24, 2005. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that, currently, the Arkansas State Police Child Abuse Hotline will not accept reports related to newborn children being born with an illegal substance present in their blood or urine as a result of the pregnant mother's use before birth of an illegal substance or with a health problem as a result of the pregnant mother's use before birth of an illegal substance; that in order for the newborn child to be protected by the Arkansas Child Maltreatment Act and receive services, the Arkansas State Police Child Abuse Hotline must accept reports of this nature; and that this act is immediately necessary to clarify the law so that the Arkansas State Police Child Abuse Hotline can accept reports of this nature and so that the newborn children can be provided services to protect their health and safety. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.